Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 7. Transportation of Animals

§ 381.
Transportation by railroad; rest and feeding.

A railroad company transporting animals shall not permit them to be confined in cars more than 28 consecutive hours, including the time they have been confined on connecting roads, without unloading them for rest, water, and feeding for at least five consecutive hours, unless prevented from so unloading by storm or other accidental causes. Animals unloaded shall be properly fed, watered, and sheltered during each rest by the owner, or fed, watered, and sheltered during each rest by the owner or person having custody of the animals. In case of default, the railroad company transporting the animal shall provide feed and watering at the owner’s expense. In this case, the company shall have a lien upon the animals for food, care, and custody furnished.

Violation of the 28-hour rule of this section is a violation of subdivision 352(4) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2003, No. 120 (Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 382.
Transportation by truck; rest and feeding.

No person shall confine or permit to be confined any animals being transported by truck under his or her orders or control for more than 18 consecutive hours without their removal from the truck for a rest period of not less than four hours. The animals shall be provided with feed and water during this period except when reasonable space, food, and water are provided in the vehicle. Reasonable space for animals and protection from the weather shall be provided in trucks employed commercially in the long distance transportation of animals.

A person who violates a provision of this section shall be in violation of subdivision 352(4) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2003, No. 120 (Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 383.
Shipping of animals.

There shall be separation of livestock species, as defined in 6 V.S.A. § 761, when these animals are transported by either rail or truck.

Failure to provide such separation shall be a violation of subdivisions 352(3) and (4) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 1995, No. 39, § 3, eff. April 17, 1995; 2003, No. 120 (Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 384.
Preference of animals as freight.

Any private or common carrier operating within this State shall yield to vehicles containing cattle, sheep, swine, equine, or other animals to allow continuous passage in preference to other freight.
All vehicles and common carriers loaded with animals at any station shall take precedence over all other freight.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 385.
Transportation on the highway without title documents.

No person, except the owner of cattle being transported or a person acting under written authority of the owner, shall transport cattle on any public highway unless the person has in his or her possession a bill of sale or a memorandum signed by the owner of the cattle and containing the owner’s address, the number, breed, and ear tag number of the cattle, and the name of the place to which the cattle are to be transported. Any person transporting such cattle shall, on demand, exhibit a bill of sale or memorandum to any State investigator, sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, police officer, or State Police officer.

Violation of this section shall be punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than 60 days or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 386.
Confinement of animals in vehicles.

A person shall not leave an animal unattended in a standing or parked motor vehicle in a manner that would endanger the health or safety of the animal.

Any humane officer or member of a fire and rescue service may use reasonable force to remove any such animal from a motor vehicle. The officer so removing an animal shall deliver the animal to a humane society, veterinarian, or town or municipal pound. If the owner of the animal cannot be found, the officer shall place a written notice in the vehicle, bearing the name of the officer and the department and address where the animal may be claimed. The owner shall be liable for reasonable expenses, and a lien may be placed on the animal for these expenses. The officer may not be held liable for criminal or civil liability for any damage resulting from actions taken under subsection (a) of this section.

Failure to comply with subsection (a) of this section is a violation of subdivision 352(3) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2003, No. 120 (Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 387.
Transportation of horses; vehicles.

Every vehicle utilized for the transportation of more than seven horses on the highway shall meet the following requirements:

there shall be at least two doors for loading and unloading, which shall not be on the same side;

loading ramps shall be provided if the vertical distance from the floor of the truck to the ground is greater than 15 inches;

the interior compartment construction shall be of smooth material with no hazardous, sharp protrusions;

there shall be sufficient openings to ensure adequacy of ventilation;

partitions shall be placed in compartments having no stalls;

doorways shall be of sufficient height to allow safe loading and unloading; and

compartment height shall be sufficient to allow clearance of the poll and withers of each horse loaded.

Vehicles under this section shall have no more than one tier in compartments carrying horses.

The Secretary shall establish rules for compliance with the provisions of this subchapter.

Failure to comply with this section, or the rules established thereunder, is a violation of subdivision 352(3) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2003, No. 42, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003; 2003, No. 120 (Adj. Sess.), § 13.